New York, session 2025-2026, A11585.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The elder law is amended by adding a new section 206-a to 2 read as follows: 3 § 206-a. Caregiver crisis hotline. 1. The director, in consultation 4 with the commissioner of mental health, shall establish a caregiver 5 crisis hotline to provide emotional support resources for informal care- 6 givers of a person in need of assistance. 7 2. Such crisis hotline shall be a toll-free telephone number, avail- 8 able statewide, twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week and shall 9 provide a language assistance line to assist limited and non-English 10 language speakers. 11 3. For the purposes of this section: (a) "Informal caregiver" shall 12 mean the family member or other natural person who normally provides the 13 daily care or supervision of a person in need of supervision, or any 14 family member or other natural person who contributes to and is involved 15 in the caretaking responsibilities for such person in need of super- 16 vision. Such informal caregiver may, but need not, reside in the same 17 household as the person in need of supervision. 18 (b) "Person in need of supervision" shall mean any person who is 19 unable to attend to their daily needs without the assistance or regular 20 supervision of an informal caregiver due to mental or physical impair- 21 ment. Such definition shall not exclude persons under eighteen years of 22 age who suffer from mental or physical impairment. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 24 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13571-01-5